Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Article 1. Organization, Administration, and Powers.

Sec. 31.25.005.
Purpose.

The corporation shall, for the benefit of the state, to the fullest extent possible,

develop and have primary responsibility for developing natural gas pipelines, an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, and other transportation mechanisms to deliver natural gas in-state for the maximum benefit of the people of the state;

when developing natural gas pipelines, an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, and other transportation mechanisms to deliver natural gas in-state, provide economic benefits in the state and revenue to the state;

assist the Department of Natural Resources and the Department of Revenue to maximize the value of the state’s royalty natural gas, natural gas delivered to the state as payment of tax, and other natural gas received by the state;

advance an in-state natural gas pipeline as described in the July 1, 2011, project plan prepared under former AS 38.34.040 by the corporation while a subsidiary of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, with modifications determined by the corporation to be appropriate to develop, finance, construct, and operate an in-state natural gas pipeline in a safe, prudent, economical, and efficient manner, for the purpose of making natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons associated with natural gas other than oil, available to Fairbanks, the Southcentral region of the state, and other communities in the state at the lowest rates possible;

advance an Alaska liquefied natural gas project by developing infrastructure and providing related services, including services related to transportation, liquefaction, a marine terminal, marketing, and commercial support; if the corporation provides a service under this paragraph to the state, a public corporation or instrumentality of the state, a political subdivision of the state, or another entity of the state, the corporation may not charge a fee for the service in an amount greater than the amount necessary to reimburse the corporation for the cost of the service;

endeavor to develop natural gas pipelines and other transportation mechanisms to deliver natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons associated with natural gas other than oil, to public utility and industrial customers in areas of the state to which the natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons associated with natural gas other than oil, may be delivered at commercially reasonable rates; and

endeavor to develop natural gas pipelines and other transportation mechanisms that offer commercially reasonable rates for shippers and access for shippers who produce natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons associated with natural gas other than oil, in the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 7 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 31.25.070.
Renumbered in 2013.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added (1) — (3), redesignated (1) as (4), added (5), redesignated (2) and (3) as (6) and (7).

Sec. 31.25.007.
Expedited review and action by state agencies or entities.

A state agency or entity conducting a review or taking action relating to a project under this chapter shall expedite the review or action in a manner consistent with the timely completion of the project.

History.

(§ 4 ch 7 SLA 2010; am § 34 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.34.020(a)

; renumbered in 2014, at which time a reference to “AS 31.25 (Alaska Gasline Development Corporation)” was changed to “this chapter”.

Cross references. —

For duty of in-state gasline project coordinator to facilitate the provisions of this section, see AS

38.34.010

.

Sec. 31.25.010.
Structure.

The Alaska Gasline Development Corporation is a public corporation and government instrumentality acting in the best interest of the state for the purposes required by AS

31.25.005

, located for administrative purposes in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, but having a legal existence independent of and separate from the state. The corporation may not be terminated as long as it has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding. The corporation may dissolve when no bonds, notes, or other obligations of the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation are outstanding and the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation is no longer engaged in the development, financing, construction, or operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project. Upon termination of the corporation, its rights and property pass to the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 8 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For findings, intent, and transitional provisions relating to the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, see secs. 1 and 25, ch. 11, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, inserted “acting in the best interest of the state of the purposes required by AS

31.25.005

,” following “government instrumentality” near the beginning, and “or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project” following “in-state natural gas pipeline” near the end.

Sec. 31.25.020.
Governing body.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of

five public members; and

two individuals designated by the governor that are each the head of a principal department of the state, except that the commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of revenue may not be designated to serve on the board.

Public members of the board shall be appointed by the governor and are subject to confirmation by the legislature. When appointing a public member to the board, the governor shall consider an individual’s expertise and experience in natural gas pipeline construction, operation, and marketing; finance; large project management; and other expertise and experience that is relevant to the purpose, powers, and duties of the corporation. Public members of the board serve staggered five-year terms. A public member serves at the pleasure of the governor. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. Notwithstanding AS

39.05.100

, a public member appointed under (a)(1) of this section is not required to be a registered voter or a resident of the state. If the governor appoints a public member to the board who is not a registered voter in the state or a resident of the state, the governor shall send a written statement to the legislature with the notice of appointment explaining the governor’s reasons for making the appointment.

Notwithstanding AS

39.05.055

, the terms of the initially appointed public members of the board shall be set by the governor to be two years for two members, three years for two members, and five years for one member.

The public members of the board receive $400 compensation for each day spent on official business of the corporation and may be reimbursed by the corporation for actual and necessary expenses at the same rate paid to members of state boards under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2014; am § 9 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For findings, intent, and transitional provisions relating to the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, see secs. 1 and 25, ch. 11, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective April 17, 2014 and retroactive to September 1, 2013, in (b), added the last two sentences.

The second 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in (a)(2), deleted “unless the project for which a license is issued under AS 43.90 has been abandoned or is no longer receiving the inducements in AS

43.90.110(a)

or the commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of revenue are no longer signatories on a valid contract under AS 43.90” following “designated to serve on the board”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 7, SLA 2014, the requirement of AS

31.25.020(b)

that the governor send a written statement explaining an appointment of a person to the board of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation who is not a registered voter in the state or a resident of the state applies to a person appointed on or after April 17, 2014.

Under sec. 3, ch. 7, SLA 2014, the 2014 amendments to AS

31.25.020(b)

, made by sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2014, are retroactive to September 1, 2013.

Sec. 31.25.030.
Meetings of board.

The board shall elect a chair, secretary, and treasurer from among its membership at each annual meeting. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum for organizing the board, conducting its business, and exercising the powers of the corporation. The board shall meet at the call of the chair. The board shall meet at least once every three months.

The board may meet and transact business by electronic media if

public notice of the time and locations where the meeting will be held by electronic media has been given in the same manner as if the meeting were held in a single location;

participants and members of the public in attendance can hear and have the same right to participate in the meeting as if the meeting were conducted in person; and

copies of pertinent reference materials, statutes, regulations, and audio-visual materials are reasonably available to participants and to the public.

A meeting by electronic media as provided in this section has the same legal effect as a meeting in person.

For the purposes of this chapter, public notice of 24 hours or more is adequate notice of a meeting of the board at which the issuance of corporation bonds is authorized.

An affirmative vote of at least four members of the board is required to approve

the sale and issuance of bonds;

the sale or other disposition of a substantial asset or substantial amount of the assets of the corporation; the corporation shall adopt a regulation that defines a substantial asset and a substantial amount of assets for the purposes of this paragraph;

the ownership structure for a pipeline project of which the corporation is a participant;

an action committing the corporation to an additional natural gas pipeline project; and

action on other matters identified in a regulation adopted by the corporation as being subject to this subsection.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.035.
Minutes of meetings.

The board shall keep minutes of each meeting and send certified copies to the governor and to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.040.
Administration of affairs; program directors.

The board shall manage the assets and business of the corporation and may adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and regulations governing the manner in which the business of the corporation is conducted and the manner in which its powers are exercised. The board shall delegate supervision of the administration of the corporation to the executive director, appointed in accordance with AS

31.25.045

.

The board shall adopt and publish procedures to govern the procurement by the corporation of supplies, services, professional services, and construction. The procurement procedures must provide for an Alaska veterans’ preference that is consistent with the Alaska veterans’ preference in AS

36.30.175

.

To the maximum extent practicable, the board shall

maximize the efficient use of state resources; and

establish appropriate separation within the corporation by separating personnel and functions and by other means to the extent that separation may be required by contract or applicable law for the purpose of screening and preventing the exchange of commercially sensitive information when developing an in-state natural gas pipeline, an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, and other transportation mechanisms to deliver natural gas in the state.

The board may appoint a program director for an Alaska liquefied natural gas project. The board may appoint a separate program director for an in-state natural gas pipeline as described in the July 1, 2011, project plan prepared under former AS 38.34.040 and defined in AS

31.25.390

. A program director appointed under this section shall

serve at the pleasure of the board; and

report to the executive director of the corporation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 10 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 31.25.045.
Executive director.

The corporation shall employ an executive director who may not be a member of the board. The executive director shall be appointed by the board and serves at the pleasure of the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.050.
Legal counsel.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the corporation shall retain legal counsel to advise the corporation in legal matters and represent it in litigation.

The attorney general shall

be the legal counsel for the corporation for legal services related to the development of contracts and agreements by the corporation that relate to an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; and

consult with the corporation when procuring outside counsel for legal services for the corporation related to an Alaska liquefied natural gas project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am §§ 11, 12 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in (a), substituted “Except as provided in (b) of this section, the corporation” for “The corporation”; added (b), and made related changes.

Sec. 31.25.060.
Employment of personnel.

The board may appoint other officers and engage professional and technical advisors as independent contractors. The executive director may hire employees of the corporation and engage professional and technical advisors under contract with the corporation. The board shall prescribe the duties and compensation of corporation personnel, including the executive director.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.065.
Personnel exempt from State Personnel Act.

The personnel of the corporation are exempt from AS 39.25.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.080.
Powers and duties.

In addition to other powers granted in this chapter, the corporation may

determine the form of ownership and the operating structure of an in-state natural gas pipeline developed by the corporation and may enter into agreements with other persons for joint ownership, joint operation, or both of an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project;

plan, finance, construct, develop, acquire, maintain, and operate a pipeline system and other transportation mechanism, including pipelines, compressors, storage facilities, and other related facilities, equipment, and works of public improvement, in the state to facilitate production, transportation, and delivery of natural gas or other related natural resources to the point of consumption or to the point of distribution for consumption;

lease or rent facilities, structures, and properties;

exercise the power of eminent domain and file a declaration of taking under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

to acquire land or an interest in land that is necessary for an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; the exercise of powers by the corporation under this paragraph may not exceed the permissible exercise of the powers by the state;

acquire, by purchase, lease, or gift, land, structures, real or personal property, an interest in property, a right-of-way, a franchise, an easement, or other interest in land, or an interest in or right to capacity in a pipeline system determined to be necessary or convenient for the development, financing, construction, or operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline project or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project or part of an in-state natural gas pipeline project or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project;

transfer or otherwise dispose of all or part of an in-state natural gas pipeline project, an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, or an interest in an asset of the corporation;

elect to provide transportation of natural gas as a contract carrier, common carrier, or otherwise;

provide light, water, security, and other services for property of the corporation;

conduct hearings to gather and develop data consistent with the purpose and powers of the corporation;

advocate for new pipeline capacity before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;

make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation under this chapter, including a contract with a person, firm, corporation, governmental agency, or other entity;

sue and be sued in its own name;

adopt an official seal;

adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and adopt regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, appraisers, and other consultants and employees that may, in the judgment of the corporation, be required and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the corporation;

procure insurance against a loss in connection with its operation;

borrow money as provided in this chapter to carry out its corporate purposes and issue its obligations as evidence of borrowing;

include in a borrowing the amounts necessary to pay financing charges, to pay interest on the obligations, and to pay the interest, consultant, advisory, and legal fees, and other expenses that are necessary or incident to the borrowing;

receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements of an appropriation, gift, grant, or donation of property or money;

do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter;

invest or reinvest, subject to its contracts with noteholders and bondholders, money or funds held by the corporation, including funds in the in-state natural gas pipeline fund (AS

31.25.100

) and the Alaska liquefied natural gas project fund (AS

31.25.110

), in obligations or other securities or investments in which banks or trust companies in the state may legally invest funds held in reserves or sinking funds or funds not required for immediate disbursement, and in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by obligations of, or guaranteed by, the state or the United States;

enter into, as it determines to be necessary or appropriate, any swap or hedge, cap, or other contract providing for payments based on levels of or changes in interest rates or indices or in the cost or price of any commodity, supply, or expense expected to be used or incurred in connection with the acquisition, construction, or operation of any facility or property owned, leased, or operated by the corporation, or an option with respect to any of the foregoing;

except as provided in (g) of this section, acquire an ownership or participation interest in an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, natural gas treatment facilities, natural gas pipeline facilities, liquefaction facilities, marine terminal facilities related to the infrastructure of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, or an entity or joint venture that has an ownership interest in or is engaged in the planning, financing, acquisition, maintenance, construction, and operation of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project;

after consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of natural resources, enter into contracts relating to an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, including contracts for services related to operation, marketing, transportation, gas treatment, marine terminal operation, or liquefaction.

Upon commencement of construction of an in-state natural gas pipeline, the corporation shall analyze potential natural gas pipelines and other transportation mechanisms connecting to industrial, residential, or utility customers in other regions of the state. If the corporation finds that a natural gas pipeline or other transportation mechanism analyzed under this subsection is in the best interest of the state and can meet the needs of industrial, residential, or utility customers at commercially reasonable rates, the corporation may finance, construct, or operate the natural gas pipeline or other transportation mechanism as necessary. When developing or constructing a connecting line or other transportation mechanism, the corporation shall, to the maximum extent feasible, use existing land, structures, real or personal property, rights-of-way, easements, or other interests in land acquired by the corporation.

The corporation may not develop or construct a natural gas pipeline that is a competing natural gas pipeline project for purposes of AS

43.90.440

.

The corporation shall establish a schedule of reasonable fees, rental rates, and other charges, and collect fees, rentals, and other charges for use of the facilities of the corporation.

If commitments to acquire firm transportation capacity for the in-state natural gas pipeline are received in an open season conducted by the corporation, the corporation shall, within 10 days after accepting and executing the written commitments received during the open season, report the results of the open season to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and inform the public of the results of the open season through publication on the Internet website of the corporation and in a press release or other announcement to the media. The results made public must include the name of each prospective shipper, the amount of capacity allocated, and the period of the commitment. If the corporation determines that the commitments received during the open season are not sufficient to permit the corporation to continue the development or construction of the natural gas pipeline, the corporation shall report that to the legislature within 30 days.

[Repealed, § 71 ch 14 SLA 2014.]

The power in (a)(23) of this section may not be exercised by an entity or subsidiary of the corporation that is advancing the development of an in-state natural gas pipeline.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am §§ 13 — 15, 71 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the corporation to consult with the Department of Transportation in the evaluation of the design and construction of a new, separate bridge across the Yukon River that would accommodate both vehicular traffic and a gas pipeline resulting from an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, see sec. 72(a), ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the corporation to consult with the Department of Transportation and the Department of Natural Resources in the evaluation of existing bridges and infrastructure and bridges and infrastructure constructed to accommodate a gas pipeline resulting from an Alaska liquefied natural gas project and determination whether the bridge or infrastructure could also be constructed for transportation uses, including vehicular traffic, see sec. 72(b),
ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the corporation to consult with the commissioner of natural resources in the preparation of a report to the legislature on a plan and alternatives to make North Slope natural gas available for delivery and use in the state, see sec. 73, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the corporation to consult with the Alaska Energy Authority about the development of a plan for developing infrastructure to deliver more affordable energy to areas of the state that are not expected to have direct access to a North Slope natural gas pipeline, to be provided by the Alaska Energy Authority to the legislature before January 1, 2017, see sec. 75, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, throughout (a), inserted “or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project” following “in-state natural gas pipeline”, in (a)(6), deleted “developed by the corporation or transfer or otherwise dispose of” preceding “an interest in an asset”, in (a)(21), inserted “and the Alaska liquefied natural gas project fund (AS

31.25.110

)” following “in-state natural gas pipeline fund (AS

31.25.100

)”, added (a)(23) and (a)(24); in (e), inserted “for the in-state natural gas pipeline” following “transportation capacity” near the beginning; repealed (f); added (g).

Sec. 31.25.090.
Confidentiality; interagency cooperation.

The corporation shall have access to information of departments, agencies, and public corporations of the state that is directly related to the planning, financing, development, acquisition, maintenance, construction, or operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline. The corporation shall avoid duplicating studies, plans, and designs that have already been provided or obtained by other state entities. All departments, agencies, and public corporations of the state shall cooperate with and shall provide information, services, and facilities to the corporation upon its request and, except for requests from the Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator appointed under AS

43.90.250

, give priority to processing authorization applications and other requests of the corporation.

Upon request by the corporation, a state entity shall provide water, sand and gravel, other nonhydrocarbon natural resources, and a permit or a lease to the corporation at the usual and customary rates, except as provided in (d) of this section. Review of and action on a request shall be conducted and taken as provided in AS

38.34.020

. In this subsection, “state entity” means a state department, authority, or other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government, a public university, or a public corporation of the state.

That part of the cost of providing, under (b) of this section, water, sand and gravel, or other nonhydrocarbon natural resources, or of entering into a lease or issuing a permit, that is borne by the corporation for an in-state natural gas pipeline project that is owned in whole or in part by the corporation may not be included in the rate base in a proceeding under AS 42 or before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the Department of Natural Resources shall grant the corporation a right-of-way lease under AS 38.35 for the gas pipeline transportation corridor at no appraisal or rental cost if

a complete right-of-way lease application under AS

38.35.050

is submitted;

the lease application is made the subject of notice and other reasonable and appropriate publication requirements under AS

38.35.070

; and

the corporation submits the application for the right-of-way lease and agrees to be bound by those right-of-way lease covenants set out in

AS

38.35.120

for an in-state natural gas pipeline that the corporation intends to be a common carrier; or

AS

38.35.121

for an in-state natural gas pipeline that the corporation intends to be a contract carrier.

After approval by the commissioner of natural resources, a right-of-way lease received by the corporation under (d) of this section may be transferred to a successor in interest under the same terms and conditions applicable to the right-of-way lease granted to the corporation.

The corporation may enter into confidentiality agreements necessary to acquire or provide information to carry out its functions. If a state agency determines that a law or provision of a contract to which the state agency is a party requires the state agency to preserve the confidentiality of the information and that delivering the information to the corporation would violate the confidentiality provision of that law or contract, the state agency shall

identify the applicable law or contract provision to the corporation; and

obtain the consent of the person who has the right to waive the confidentiality of the information under the applicable law or contract provision before the state agency transfers the information to the corporation.

The portions of records containing information acquired or provided by the corporation under a confidentiality agreement are not subject to AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

. The corporation may enter into confidentiality agreements with a public agency, as defined in AS

40.25.220

, to allow release of confidential information. The portions of the records and files of a public agency bound by a confidentiality agreement that reflect, incorporate, or analyze information subject to a confidentiality agreement under this subsection are not public records. Confidentiality agreements entered into under this subsection are valid and binding against all parties in accordance with the terms of the confidentiality agreement.

Information and trade secrets of the corporation are confidential and not subject to AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

if the corporation determines that disclosure would cause commercial or competitive harm or damage to the corporation. Information that discloses the particulars of a business or the affairs of a private enterprise, investor, advisor, consultant, counsel, or manager that is developed or obtained by the corporation and related to the development, financing, construction, or operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline project by the corporation is confidential and not subject to AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

. The corporation may waive the confidentiality described in this subsection, except for information that is confidential under another provision of state law or under a federal law or regulation and except for information acquired from another person that is subject to a confidentiality agreement, if the waiver is consistent with the interests of the state and will facilitate the development, financing, or construction of an in-state natural gas pipeline. On the date that the in-state natural gas pipeline project becomes operational, the corporation shall make available, upon request under AS 40.25.100 — 40.25.295, records that were exempt from AS 40.25.100 — 40.25.295 under this subsection or (g) of this section, unless the corporation determines that

maintaining the confidentiality of the information is necessary to protect the economic interests of the corporation or the state; or

disclosure of the information will violate another provision of state law, a federal law or regulation, or the terms of a confidentiality agreement or other agreement to which the corporation is a party or that is binding on the corporation.

Subject to limitations on the disclosure of confidential information in (g) and (h) of this section, the corporation shall provide to the commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of revenue access to information that is related to the development of contracts under AS

38.05.020(b)(10)

and (11).

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 16 ch 14 SLA 2014; am §§ 27, 28 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added (i).

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS 40.25” once in (g) and four times in (h).

Sec. 31.25.100.
In-state natural gas pipeline fund.

The in-state natural gas pipeline fund is established in the corporation and consists of money appropriated to it. The corporation shall determine fund management and may contract with the Department of Revenue for fund management. Unless otherwise provided by law, money appropriated to the fund lapses into the general fund on the day this section is repealed. Interest and other income received on money in the fund shall be separately accounted for and may be appropriated to the fund. The corporation may use money appropriated to the fund without further appropriation for the cost of managing the fund and for the planning, financing, development, acquisition, maintenance, construction, and operation of the in-state natural gas pipeline described in AS

31.25.005

(4) and for the purposes in AS

31.25.005

(4), (6), and (7).

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 17 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added “described in AS

31.25.005

(4) and for the purposes in AS

31.25.005

(4), (6), and (7)” at the end of the section, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 31.25.110.
Alaska liquefied natural gas project fund.

The Alaska liquefied natural gas project fund is established in the corporation and consists of money appropriated to it. The corporation shall determine fund management and may contract with the Department of Revenue for fund management. If money is appropriated to the fund to finance the cost of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, the corporation shall create an account in the fund for that purpose and hold the money appropriated for that purpose in that account. Interest and other income received on money in the fund shall be separately accounted for and may be appropriated to the fund. The corporation may use money appropriated to the fund without further appropriation for the purpose of managing the fund, for purposes related to an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, and for the purpose of transferring net revenue received by the corporation related to equity interests, contracts, and other activities to the appropriate fund of the state as determined by the commissioner of revenue in consultation with the commissioner of natural resources.

History.

(§ 18 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 80, ch. 14, SLA 2014 makes this section effective May 9, 2014.

Sec. 31.25.120.
Creation of subsidiaries.

The corporation may create subsidiary corporations for the purpose of developing, constructing, operating, and financing in-state natural gas pipeline projects or other transportation mechanisms; for the purpose of aiding in the development, construction, operation, and financing of in-state natural gas pipeline projects; or for the purpose of acquiring natural gas from the North Slope, and natural gas from other regions of the state, including the state’s outer continental shelf, and making that natural gas available to markets in the state, including the delivery of natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons associated with natural gas other than oil, to coastal communities in the state, or for export. Subject to the limitations for the use of money appropriated to the in-state natural gas pipeline fund (AS

31.25.100

) and the Alaska liquefied natural gas project fund (AS

31.25.110

), the corporation may transfer assets of the corporation to a subsidiary created under this section. A subsidiary created under this section may borrow money and issue bonds as evidence of that borrowing and has all the powers of the corporation that the corporation grants to it. Unless otherwise provided by the corporation, the debts, liabilities, and obligations of a subsidiary corporation created under this section are not the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 19 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in the first sentence, deleted “the state’s royalty share of natural gas,” following “for the purposes of acquiring”, and at the beginning of the second sentence, substituted “Subject to the limitations for the use of money appropriated to the in-state natural gas pipeline fund (AS

31.25.100

) and the Alaska liquefied natural gas project fund (AS

31.25.110

), the” for “A subsidiary corporation created under this section may be incorporated under AS

10.20.146

—

10.20.166

, the”.

Sec. 31.25.130.
Administrative procedure; regulations.

Except for AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act), AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) does not apply to this chapter. The corporation shall make available to members of the public copies of the regulations adopted under (b) — (e) of this section.

The board may adopt regulations by motion or by resolution or in another manner permitted by its bylaws.

The board may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, at least 15 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation, the board shall give public notice of the proposed action by posting notice on the corporation’s Internet website and on the Alaska Online Public Notice System and by mailing a copy of the notice to every person who has filed a request for notice of proposed regulations with the board or the corporation. The public notice must include a statement of the time, place, and nature of the proceedings for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation and must include an informative summary of the proposed subject of the regulation. On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice, the board shall give each interested person or an authorized representative, or both, the opportunity to present statements, arguments, or contentions in writing and shall give members of the public an opportunity to present oral statements, arguments, or contentions for a total period of at least one hour. The board shall consider all relevant matter presented to it before adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation. At a hearing under this subsection, the board may continue or postpone the hearing to a time and place that it determines. A regulation that is adopted, or its amendment or repeal, may vary in content from the informative summary specified in this subsection if the subject matter of the regulation, or its amendment or repeal, remains the same and the original notice was written to ensure that members of the public are reasonably notified of the proposed subject of the board’s action in order for them to determine whether their interests could be affected by the board’s action on that subject.

A regulation or order of repeal may be adopted as an emergency regulation or order of repeal if the board makes a finding in its order of adoption or repeal, including a statement of the facts that constitute the emergency, that the adoption of the regulation or order of repeal is necessary for the immediate preservation of the orderly operation of the corporation’s bonding programs. Upon adoption of an emergency regulation, the board shall, within 10 days after adoption, give notice of the adoption in accordance with (d) of this section. An emergency regulation adopted under this subsection does not remain in effect more than 120 days unless the board complies with (d) of this section during the 120-day period.

A regulation adopted under (b) — (e) of this section becomes effective immediately upon its adoption by the board, unless otherwise specifically provided by the order of adoption.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 7 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a), deleted the third sentence, which read, “Within 45 days after adoption, the chair of the board shall submit a regulation adopted under (b) – (c) of this section to the chair of the Administrative Regulation Review Committee under AS

24.20.400

– 24.20.460.”